Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.180

Assignability of license or branch office certificate.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a license or branch office certificate granted under this chapter is not assignable or transferable.

(2) Upon the death of an individual licensee, the director shall have the right to transfer the license and any branch office certificate of the decedent to the personal representative of his or her estate for the period of the unexpired term of the license and such additional time, not to exceed one year from the date of death of the licensee, as said personal representative may need in order to settle the deceased's estate or sell the collection agency.

[ 2011 c 336 s 513; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 9.]